Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 6. Public Guardians.

Administrative Code. —

For fees for guardian and conservator services, see 2 AAC 60, art. 2.

Sec. 13.26.700.
Purpose.

The legislature recognizes that many Alaskans, for reasons of incapacity or minority, are in need of a guardian or conservator.
Often these persons cannot find a person able and willing to serve as guardian or conservator.
The legislature intends through AS

13.26.700

—

13.26.750

to establish the function of public guardian for the purpose of furnishing guardianship and conservatorship services.
It further intends by establishing this function to provide assistance to guardians throughout the state in securing necessary services for their wards and to assist the courts, attorneys, visitors, respondents, and proposed guardians in the orderly and expeditious handling of guardianship proceedings.

History.

(§ 18 ch 83 SLA 1981; am § 7 ch 55 SLA 1984)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.360

; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.700

—

13.26.750

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.360

—

13.26.410

”.

Sec. 13.26.710.
Public guardian.

The office of public advocacy (AS

44.21.400

) shall serve as the public guardian.

A court may order the public guardian to act as full guardian, partial guardian, conservator, or special conservator for a person who is determined under this chapter to be in need of guardianship or conservatorship service if no person or private guardianship association is willing and qualified to perform the function.

History.

(§ 18 ch 83 SLA 1981; am § 8 ch 55 SLA 1984)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.370; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.720.
Powers and duties of public guardian.

The public guardian has the same powers and duties with respect to the public guardian’s wards and protected persons as a private guardian or conservator.

The public guardian, when appointed as guardian or conservator, shall endeavor, for as long as practical, to find a suitable private guardian or conservator for the public guardian’s ward or protected person. For each ward and protected person, the public guardian shall include in its annual report under AS

13.26.276(a)

to the court having jurisdiction of the ward or protected person information on the availability of a private guardian or conservator.

The public guardian shall

establish and maintain relationships with governmental, public, and private agencies, institutions, and organizations to assure the most effective guardianship or conservatorship program for each ward and protected person;

visit each of the public guardian’s wards and protected persons at least once every quarter to monitor their welfare;

keep and maintain financial and statistical records of all cases in which the public guardian provides guardianship or conservatorship services;

provide information and referrals to the public regarding guardianship and conservatorship proceedings, but not information that would identify a particular case;

assist guardians and court-appointed visitors of wards and respondents in the preparation and revision of guardianship plans and reports;

assist guardians to understand the disabilities of wards and to foster the increased independence of wards;

assist guardians in securing the rights, benefits, and services to which their wards are entitled;

develop and maintain a current listing of public and private medical, mental health, social advocacy, educational, rehabilitative, counseling, therapeutic, homemaking, recreational, and financial services and programs available to assist wards and protected persons and their families.

The public guardian may

contract for services necessary to carry out the duties of the public guardian’s office;

accept the services of volunteer workers or consultants and reimburse them for their necessary expenses.

The records required to be kept and maintained under (c)(3) of this section are confidential and are not subject to inspection or copying under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

unless the records are relevant to an investigation or proceeding involving the public guardian or a case in which the public guardian provided guardianship or conservatorship services.

History.

(§ 18 ch 83 SLA 1981; am § 27 ch 84 SLA 2004; am § 26 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.380; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.276(a)

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.118(a)”.

Sec. 13.26.730.
Intervention by public guardian.

The public guardian may, on the public guardian’s own motion or at the request of the court, intervene in a guardianship or conservatorship proceeding if the public guardian or the court considers the intervention to be justified because

an appointed guardian or conservator is not fulfilling duties;

the estate is subject to waste as a result of the costs of the guardianship or conservatorship;

a willing and qualified guardian or conservator is not available; or

the best interests of the ward, respondent, protected person, or person who is the subject of a conservatorship proceeding require the intervention.

History.

(§ 18 ch 83 SLA 1981)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.390; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.740.
Staff; delegation of powers and duties.

The public guardian may employ staff and delegate to members of the staff or to volunteers the powers and duties as guardian or conservator and other powers and duties under this chapter. However, the public guardian retains responsibility for the proper performance of the delegated powers and duties. The public guardian may only delegate powers and duties under this chapter to an individual who meets the eligibility requirements of AS

13.26.311

and has passed the criminal history record information check under AS

08.26.070

. In addition, the individual must either hold a current certification as a guardian from a nationally recognized organization at the time of the delegation or apply for and receive that certification within one year of the delegation.

History.

(§ 18 ch 83 SLA 1981; am § 27 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.400; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.311

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.145

”.

Sec. 13.26.750.
Allocation of costs of public guardian.

The commissioner of administration may establish by regulation a schedule of reasonable fees for the costs of the public guardian’s services. The fee schedule established may be based upon the ability of the ward or protected person to pay for guardian services but may not exceed the actual cost of providing public guardian services. The office of public advocacy shall charge and collect the fees established under this subsection, but may waive collection of a fee upon a finding that collection is not economically feasible or in the public interest.

[Repealed, § 79 ch 63 SLA 1993.]

The public guardian may investigate the financial status of (1) a person who requests the appointment of the public guardian as the person’s guardian or conservator; and (2) a ward for whom a court has appointed the public guardian.

The public guardian may require a person described in (c) of this section to execute and deliver written requests or authorizations necessary under law to provide the public guardian with access to records of public or private sources, otherwise confidential, needed to evaluate the person’s financial eligibility. The public guardian may, upon request and without payment of fees otherwise required by law, obtain information from any office of the state or of a political subdivision or agency of the state that possesses public records.

Before the office of public advocacy releases a ward’s funds following the termination of the public guardian’s appointment, the office may collect from the ward’s funds held by the office the reasonable value of the services rendered without cost to the ward or protected person.

The annual estimated balance in the account maintained under AS

37.05.142

may be used by the legislature to make appropriations to the Department of Administration to carry out the purposes of AS

44.21.400

—

44.21.410

(office of public advocacy).

History.

(§ 18 ch 83 SLA 1981; am §§ 33 — 35, 79 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 28 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.410

; renumbered in 2016.

Cross references. —

For effect of the 1993 amendment of (a) of this section on Alaska Rule of Probate Procedure 16(d), see § 86, ch. 63, SLA 1993 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For fees for guardian and conservator services, see 2 AAC 60, art. 2.